District of Columbia statutes.
9-321

Michigan Avenue Viaduct — Use by street railway companies.

No street railway company shall use the viaduct or any approaches thereto authorized by § 9-320 for its tracks until the said company shall have paid to the Collector of Taxes of the District of Columbia a sum equal to one-fourth of the cost of said viaduct and approaches, which sum shall be deposited to the credit of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 3, 1927, 44 Stat. 1352, ch. 305, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-521.
1973 Ed., § 7-521.

Editor's Notes

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 9-310.